Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-615
Identification number, obscure, and article, defined.

As used in sections 28-615 to 28-617:

(1) Identification number shall mean a serial or motor number placed by a manufacturer upon an article as a permanent individual identifying mark;

(2) Obscure shall mean to destroy, remove, alter, conceal, or deface so as to render illegible by ordinary means of inspection; and

(3) Article shall mean any product made by a manufacturer and includes but is not limited to any appliance, radio, television, motor vehicle, tractor or other farm machinery.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 137.